Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 10.555, is amended to read: 10.555 deleted text begin CESAR CHAVEZdeleted text end new text begin LATINO HERITAGEnew text end DAY. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end March 31 shall be known as deleted text begin Cesar Chavezdeleted text end new text begin Latino Heritagenew text end Day to celebrate the growing Latino community in Minnesota. Latinos constitute a major demographic in the state. Dedicating March 31 deleted text begin ofdeleted text end each year as deleted text begin Cesar Chavezdeleted text end new text begin Latino Heritagenew text end Day provides the citizens of Minnesota the opportunity to learn about and appreciate the Latino community and deleted text begin theirdeleted text end new text begin the community'snew text end contributions to our state. deleted text begin (b) As a community organizer, Chavez improved the lives and working conditions of millions of Latinos nationwide. He dedicated his life to advocating for labor rights, political representation for ethnic minorities, environmental justice, registering voters, and improving literacy for farm workers. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end